Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1833.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin AITKIN PUBLIC SCHOOLS; SALES TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials and supplies used in and equipment incorporated into the construction, reconstruction, upgrade, expansion, renovation, or remodeling of the following projects in the Aitkin Public School District are exempt from sales and use tax under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, if the materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after May 31, 2025, and before January 1, 2028: new text end new text begin (1) a prekindergarten through grade 6 elementary school; new text end new text begin (2) a bus transportation facility; new text end new text begin (3) a community wellness center; and new text end new text begin (4) a high school. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). Refunds must not be issued until after June 30, 2025. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after May 31, 2025, and before January 1, 2028. new text end